California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 provided that those relationships are in the best interest of the child. The social worker or probation officer shall ask every child who is 10 years of age or older and who has been in out-of-home placement for six months or longer to identify individuals other than the child’s siblings who are important to the child, and may ask any other child to provide that information, or may seek that information from the child and family team, as appropriate. The social worker or probation officer shall make efforts to identify other individuals who are important to the child, consistent with the child’s best interests.

(k) The child’s caregiver shall be provided a copy of a plan outlining the child’s needs and services. The nonminor dependent’s caregiver shall be provided with a copy of the nonminor’s TILP.

(l) Each county shall ensure that the total number of visits made by
 caseworkers on a monthly basis to children in foster care during a federal fiscal year is not less than 95 percent of the total number of those visits that would occur if each child were visited once every month while in care and that the majority of the visits occur in the residence of the child. The county child welfare and probation departments shall comply with data reporting requirements that the department deems necessary to comply with the federal Child and Family Services Improvement Act of 2006 (Public Law 109-288) and the federal Child and Family Services Improvement and Innovation Act (Public Law 112-34).

(m) The implementation and operation of the amendments to subdivision (i) enacted at the 2005–06 Regular Session shall be subject to appropriation through the budget process and by phase, as provided in Section 366.35.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 32.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.15.

As used in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 16501.1, a home or setting that is “safe” means that the home or setting is free from abuse or neglect, as described in Section 11165.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 847, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.16.

In addition to the assurances required to be included in a case plan pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, a case plan shall include all of the following:

(a) (1) The health and education summary as required under Section 16010, including the name and contact information of the person or persons currently holding the right to make educational decisions for the child.

(2) In instances where it is determined that disclosure pursuant to paragraph (1) of the contact information of the person or persons currently holding the right to make educational decisions for the child poses a
 threat to the health and safety of that individual or those individuals, that contact information shall be redacted or withheld from the evaluation.

(b) The same factual discussion regarding educational decisions required in the study under subdivision (e) of Section 358.1.

(c) An assurance that the placement agency provided the health and education summary to the current caregiver, explained to the caregiver his or her rights and responsibilities under Sections 49069.3 and 56055 of the Education Code and Section 16010 of this code, and assisted any caregiver in obtaining the information needed for the health and education summary to comply with Section 16010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 829, Sec. 11.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.2.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Safety, stability, and the permanence of families in the child welfare system are of paramount importance.

(2) Ongoing assessments that build on the strength of the child and family unit, and that identify desired outcomes, are critical in the development of appropriate case plans for children.

(3) If it is necessary to place a child in out-of-home care, the use of a formal child and family assessment can enhance the appropriateness of placement and the identification and delivery of services necessary to meet the child’s needs and strengths, consistent with case plan goals.

(b) On or before December 31, 1998, the department shall issue to all county placing agencies and the courts, current best practice guidelines for the assessment of a child and the child’s family unit. The guidelines shall include recommended methods for gathering certain background information on the child and the child’s family unit, identifying appropriate services for the case plan, and methods of monitoring and reassessing the case plan to best meet case plan goals. For children placed in group homes or foster family agencies, the guidelines shall include methods for identifying appropriate placement
 options, and monitoring the services provided by the group home or foster family agency to best address the strengths and needs of the child and the child’s family unit.

(c) (1) The department shall conduct a pilot project to test the effectiveness of utilizing best practice standards for the assessment of children and families receiving child welfare and foster care services, for the purpose of identifying the strengths and needs of the family and the child, developing and monitoring appropriate case plans, and determining appropriate services.

(2) The pilot project shall meet all of the following conditions:

(A) On or before July 1, 1999, the department shall solicit participation in the pilot project by counties, and, to the extent possible, provide for broad geographical representation. On
 or before September 1, 1999, the department shall select pilot counties and begin operation of the pilot project.

(B) The pilot project shall use an assessment protocol or process developed by the department in collaboration with county agencies and other stakeholders.

(C) The pilot project shall be evaluated independently to judge the effectiveness of the assessment protocol or instrument, including whether the assessment provides adequate background data on the child and the child’s family unit, improves achievement of case plan goals, is judged useful to the counties and service providers, and can be applied with ease.

(D) For children placed in group homes or foster family agencies, the assessment protocol or process developed pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall identify the strengths and needs of the child to be
 met by the placement program and methods for monitoring the delivery of services by the placement agencies.

(E) The assessment shall be sensitive to the ethnic and linguistic background of the children and families being assessed, and shall include, but not be limited to, the child’s age, previous placement history, specific indicators, including living situation, social situation, medical situation, educational situation, vocational situation, emotional situation, behavioral situation, and legal, cultural, and religious history, and areas and activities of interest.

(d) In collaboration with county agencies and other stakeholders, and based on the results of the pilot project described in this section, the department shall develop a formal assessment process for children receiving foster care and child welfare services. On or before May 1, 2001, the department shall inform the
 Legislature on the status of the pilot project described in this section, and the proposed assessment protocol or process with recommendations for its implementation, including incorporation of the assessment process into the child welfare services case management system.

(e) Upon satisfactory completion of the pilot project described in this section, and development of a formal assessment instrument or process, the department, in collaboration with representatives of county placing agencies, training academies, and the California Social Work Education Center, shall integrate training and technical assistance on the family assessment guidelines into the curriculum of the regional training academies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 311, Sec. 68.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.25.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “teen parent” means a child who has been adjudged to be a dependent child or ward of the court on the grounds that he or she is a person described under Section 300 or 602, or a ward of a nonrelated legal guardian whose guardianship was established pursuant to Section 360 or 366.26, living in out-of-home placement in a whole family foster home, as defined in subdivision (u) of Section 11400, who is a parent. Commencing January 1, 2012, “teen parent” also means a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who is living in a whole family foster home, as defined in subdivision (t) of Section 11400, and is eligible for AFDC-FC or Kin-GAP payments pursuant to Section 11403.

(b) (1) When the child of a teen parent is not subject to the jurisdiction of the dependency court but is in the full or partial physical custody of the teen parent, a written shared responsibility plan shall be developed. The plan shall be developed between the teen parent, caregiver, and a representative of the county child welfare agency or probation department, and in the case of a certified family home or resource family of a foster family agency, a representative of the agency providing direct and immediate supervision to the caregiver. Additional input may be provided by any individuals identified by the teen parent, the other parent of the child, if appropriate, and other extended family members. The plan shall be developed as soon as is practicably possible. However, if one or more of the above stakeholders are not
 available to participate in the creation of the plan within the first 30 days of the teen parent’s placement, the teen parent and caregiver may enter into a plan for the purposes of fulfilling the requirements of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 11465, which may be modified at a later time when the other individuals become available.

(2) The plan shall be designed to preserve and strengthen the teen parent family unit, as described in Section 16002.5, to assist the teen parent in meeting the goals outlined in Section 16002.5, to facilitate a supportive home environment for the teen parent and the child, and to ultimately enable the teen parent to independently provide a safe, stable, and permanent home for the child. The plan shall in no way limit the teen parent’s legal right to make decisions regarding
 the care, custody, and control of the child.

(3) The plan shall be written for the express purpose of aiding the teen parent and the caregiver to reach agreements aimed at reducing conflict and misunderstandings. The plan shall outline, with as much specificity as is practicable, the duties, rights, and responsibilities of both the teen parent and the caregiver with regard to the child, and identify supportive services to be offered to the teen parent by the caregiver or, in the case of a certified family home or resource family of a foster family agency, the agency providing direct and immediate supervision to the caregiver, or both. The plan shall be updated, as needed, to account for the changing needs of infants and toddlers, and in accordance with the teen parent’s changing school, employment, or other outside responsibilities. The plan
 shall not conflict with the teen parent’s case plan. Areas to be addressed by the plan include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Feeding.

(B) Clothing.

(C) Hygiene.

(D) Purchase of necessary items, including, but not limited to, safety items, food, clothing, and developmentally appropriate toys and books. This includes both one-time purchases and items needed on an ongoing basis.

(E) Health care.

(F) Transportation to health care appointments, child care, and school, as appropriate.

(G) Provision of child care and babysitting.

(H) Discipline.

(I) Sleeping arrangements.

(J) Visits among the child, his or her noncustodial parent, and other appropriate family members, including the responsibilities of the teen parent, the caregiver, and the foster family agency, as appropriate, for facilitating the visitation. The shared responsibility plan shall not conflict with the teen parent’s case plan and any visitation orders made by the court.

(c) Upon completion of the shared responsibility plan and any subsequent updates to the plan, a copy shall be provided to the teen parent and his
 or her attorney, the caregiver, the county child welfare agency or probation department, and, in the case of a certified family home or resource family of a foster family agency, the agency providing direct and immediate supervision to the caregiver.

(d) The shared responsibility plan requirements shall no longer apply when the two hundred-dollar ($200) monthly payment is made under the Kin-GAP program pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 to a former whole family foster home pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11465.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 99.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.26.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “nonminor dependent parent” means a nonminor dependent as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, residing in a supervised independent living placement as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 11400, who is a parent.

(b) When the child of a nonminor dependent parent is not subject to the jurisdiction of the dependency court, but is in the full or partial
 custody of the nonminor dependent, a written parenting support plan may be developed between the nonminor dependent parent and an identified responsible adult who has agreed to act as a parenting mentor to the nonminor dependent parent. The plan, if developed, shall be developed between the nonminor dependent parent, the identified responsible adult, and a representative of the county child welfare agency or probation department. Additional input may be provided by any individuals identified by the nonminor dependent parent, the other parent of the child, if appropriate, and other extended family members. The plan shall be developed as soon as is practicably possible. However, if one or more of the above stakeholders are not available to participate in the creation of the plan within the first 30 days of the nonminor dependent parent’s request to enter into the plan, the nonminor dependent parent and the identified responsible adult may enter into a plan for the purposes of fulfilling the requirements of
 subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 11465, which may be modified at a later time when the other individuals become available.

(1) The plan shall be designed to preserve and strengthen the nonminor dependent parent family unit, as described in Section 16002.5, to assist the nonminor dependent parent in meeting the goals outlined in Section 16002.5, to assist the nonminor dependent parent in maintaining a safe, stable, and permanent home for the child, and to support the nonminor dependent parent’s educational and employment goals. The plan shall in no way limit the nonminor dependent parent’s legal right to make decisions regarding the care, custody, and control of the child.

(2) The plan shall be written for the express purpose of identifying additional support and assisting the nonminor dependent parent in providing the best care plan for his or her
 child. The plan shall outline, with as much specificity as is practicable, the ways in which the identified responsible adult will assist the nonminor dependent parent with regard to the child, and identify supportive services to be offered to the nonminor dependent parent by the identified responsible adult. The plan shall be updated, as needed, to account for the changing needs of infants and toddlers, and in accordance with the nonminor dependent parent’s changing school, employment, or other outside responsibilities. The plan shall not conflict with the nonminor dependent parent’s transitional independent living case plan or any visitation orders made by the court. Areas to be addressed by the plan may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Transportation to health care appointments, child care, and school, as appropriate.

(B) Providing child care and
 babysitting.

(c) Upon completion of the parenting support plan and any subsequent updates to the plan, a copy shall be provided to the nonminor dependent parent and his or her attorney, the identified responsible adult, and the county child welfare agency or probation department.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 770, Sec. 3.   (AB 2668)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.27.

(a) For purposes of Section 16501.26, a person who wishes to become an identified responsible adult to a nonminor dependent parent shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) Meet the minimum criteria established pursuant to Section 16501.28.

(2) Be at least 21 years of age.

(3) Undergo a criminal records check in accordance with Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Undergo a Child Abuse Central Index check pursuant to Section 11170 of the Penal Code.

(b) An identification card from a foreign consulate or foreign passport shall be considered a valid form of identification for purposes of conducting a criminal records check and fingerprint clearance check pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 770, Sec. 4.   (AB 2668)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.28.

Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department shall convene a working group no later than February 1, 2015, that includes representatives of the County Welfare Directors Association and child welfare advocates to develop an all-county letter that specifies the minimum criteria a person must meet in order to serve as an identified
 responsible adult to a nonminor dependent parent. The working group shall issue the letter to all counties by June 30, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 770, Sec. 5.   (AB 2668)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.3.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall establish and maintain a program of public health nursing in the child welfare services program that meets the federal requirements for the provision of health care to minor and nonminor dependents in foster care consistent with Section 30026.5 of the Government Code. The purpose of the public health nursing program shall be to promote and enhance the physical, mental, dental, and developmental well-being of children in the child welfare system.

(b) Under this program, counties shall use the services of a foster care public health nurse. The foster care public health nurse shall work with the appropriate child welfare services workers to coordinate health care services and serve as a liaison with health care
 professionals and other providers of health-related services. This shall include coordination with county mental health plans and local health jurisdictions, as appropriate. In order to fulfill these duties, the foster care public health nurse shall have access to the child’s medical, dental, and mental health care information, in a manner that is consistent with all relevant privacy requirements.

(c) The duties of a foster care public health nurse shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) Documenting that each child in foster care receives initial and followup health screenings that meet reasonable standards of medical practice.

(2) Collecting health information and other relevant data on each foster child as available, receiving all collected information to determine appropriate referral and
 services, and expediting referrals to providers in the community for early intervention services, specialty services, dental care, mental health services, and other health-related services necessary for the child.

(3) Participating in medical care planning and coordinating for the child. This may include, but is not limited to, assisting case workers in arranging for comprehensive health and mental health assessments, interpreting the results of health assessments or evaluations for the purpose of case planning and coordination, facilitating the acquisition of any necessary court authorizations for procedures or medications, monitoring and oversight of psychotropic medications, advocating for the health care needs of the child, and ensuring the creation of linkage among various providers of care.

(4) Providing followup contact to assess the child’s progress in meeting treatment
 goals.

(5) At the request of and under the direction of a nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, assisting the nonminor dependent in accessing physical health and mental health care, coordinating the delivery of health and mental health care services, advocating for the health and mental health care that meets the needs of the nonminor dependent, assisting the nonminor dependent to make informed decisions about the nonminor dependent’s health care by, at a minimum, providing educational materials, and assisting the nonminor dependent to assume responsibility for their ongoing physical and mental health care management.

(d) (1) The services provided by foster care public health nurses under this section shall be limited to those for which reimbursement may be claimed under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act at an
 enhanced rate for services delivered by skilled professional medical personnel. Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the State Department of Health Care Services determines that federal financial participation, as provided under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.), is available.

(2) The department, the State Department of Health Care Services, counties, and cities, as applicable, shall maximize the use of federal funds in implementing this section, including using permissible state or local funds to match funds claimable under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) for allowable expenditures made pursuant to this section.

(e) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services shall seek any necessary federal approvals for child
 welfare agencies to appropriately claim enhanced federal Title XIX funds for services provided pursuant to this section.

(2) Commencing in the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in which the necessary federal approval pursuant to paragraph (1) is secured, county child welfare agencies shall provide health care oversight and coordination services pursuant to this section, and may accomplish this through agreements with local public health agencies.

(f) The State Department of Health Care Services may, at its discretion, enter into contracts, or amend existing contracts, with a California county, city, or city and county to facilitate local administration of the program described in this section. Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision are exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and are exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10101, prior to the 2011–12 fiscal year, there shall be no required county match of the nonfederal cost of this program.

(2) Commencing in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(h) A city that operates an independent health agency may elect to administer the program described in this section with the approval
 of the State Department of Health Care Services. In this instance, the powers granted a governing body of a county shall be vested in the governing body of the city.

(i) Public health nurses shall receive training developed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 16501.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 143.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.35.

(a) County child welfare agencies and probation departments shall implement policies and procedures that require social workers and probation officers to do all of the following:

(1) Identify children receiving child welfare services, including dependents or wards in foster care, nonminor dependents, and youth receiving services pursuant to Section 677 of Title 42 of the United States Code, who are, or are at risk of becoming, victims of commercial sexual exploitation.

(2) Document individuals identified pursuant to paragraph (1) in the statewide child welfare information system and any other agency record as determined by the county.

(3) Determine appropriate services for the child or youth identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) Receive relevant training in the identification, documentation, and determination of appropriate services for any child or youth identified in paragraph (1).

(b) County child welfare agencies and probation departments shall develop and implement specific protocols to expeditiously locate any child or nonminor dependent missing from foster care. At a minimum, these policies shall do all of the following:

(1) Describe the efforts used by county child welfare or probation staff to expeditiously locate any child or nonminor dependent missing from foster care, including, but not limited to, the timeframe for reporting missing youth, the individuals or entities entitled to notice that a youth is missing, any
 required initial and ongoing efforts to locate youth, and plans to return youth to placement.

(2) Require the social worker or probation officer to do all of the following:

(A) Determine the primary factors that contributed to the child or nonminor dependent running away or otherwise being absent from care.

(B) Respond to factors identified in subparagraph (A) in subsequent placements, to the extent possible.

(C) Determine the child’s or nonminor dependent’s experiences while absent from care.

(D) Determine whether the child or nonminor dependent is a possible victim of commercial sexual exploitation.

(E) Document the
 activities and information described in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, for federal reporting purposes, consistent with instructions from the department.

(F) Provide notice immediately, but in no case later than 24 hours from receipt of information that the child or nonminor dependent is missing from foster care, to all of the following parties:

(i) The child’s or nonminor dependent’s parents or Indian custodians, unless parental notification has been limited or terminated by the court.

(ii) The child’s or nonminor dependent’s legal guardians, unless guardian notification has been limited or terminated by the court.

(iii) The attorneys for the parents, legal guardians, or Indian custodians unless notification of the parents, guardians, or Indian
 custodians has been limited or terminated by the court.

(iv) The child’s or nonminor dependent’s attorney appointed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 317, or Section 634.

(v) The child’s or nonminor dependent’s Court-Appointed Special Advocate, if one has been appointed.

(vi) The court of jurisdiction.

(vii) The child’s or nonminor dependent’s tribe or tribal representative, if the child or nonminor dependent is, or may be, an Indian child, as defined in Section 224.1.

(viii) Any known sibling of the child or nonminor dependent who is 10 years of age or older and adjudged to be a dependent child of the juvenile court, if such notice would not be contrary to the safety and well-being
 of that sibling. Notice to siblings shall be provided in a trauma-informed manner.

(ix) The local law enforcement agency, including, if applicable, any tribal law enforcement agency for the child’s tribe in the case of an Indian child, as defined in Section 224.1.

(G) Notices issued pursuant to subparagraph (F) shall include contact information for an appropriate social worker or probation officer within the agency issuing the notice.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “missing from foster care” means when the whereabouts of a child subject to an order of foster care placement are unknown to the county child welfare agency or probation department, or when the county child welfare agency or probation department has located a child subject to an order of foster care placement in a location not
 approved by the court that may pose a risk to the child, taking into account the age, intelligence, mental functioning, and physical condition of the child.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall only apply to a nonminor dependent if, based on the totality of the circumstances, the county child welfare agency or probation department suspects that the nonminor dependent did not voluntarily leave foster care or is at risk of substantial harm.

(d) In consultation with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, former foster youth, and child advocacy organizations, the department shall, no later than January 1, 2020, develop model policies, procedures, and protocols to assist the counties to comply with this section. In addition, the department shall consult with the State Department of Education,
 the State Department of Health Care Services, state and local law enforcement, and agencies with experience serving children and youth at risk of commercial sexual exploitation in the development of the model policies and procedures described in subdivision (a).

(e) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement this section through all-county letters or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 195.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.4.

In order to ensure the oversight of psychotropic medications that are prescribed for children pursuant to Section 369.5 or 739.5, all of the following shall occur:

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall provide to the State Department of Social Services, pursuant to a data sharing agreement meeting the requirements of applicable state and federal law and regulations, information for administration,
 oversight, and implementation of federal and state health and public social service programs for children in foster care. The departments shall also develop, in consultation with counties, a data sharing agreement in which county placing agencies may opt to participate, which shall enable the county to, at a minimum, receive data reports developed pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) In consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and stakeholders, the State Department of Social Services shall develop the content and format for monthly, county-specific reports that describe each child for whom one or more psychotropic medications have been paid for under Medi-Cal, including paid claims and managed care encounters. At a minimum, the report shall
 include the following information:

(A) Psychotropic medications that have been authorized for the child pursuant to Section 369.5 or 739.5.

(B) Pharmacy data, based on paid claims and managed care encounters, including the name of the psychotropic medication, quantity, and dose prescribed for the child.

(C) Other available data, including, but not limited to, information regarding psychosocial interventions and incidents of polypharmacy.

(2) The report shall include one or more indicators, developed in consultation with the stakeholders identified in paragraph (1), that note children for whom additional followup may be appropriate. The indicators may include, but need not be limited to, an indicator that identifies each child under five years of age for
 whom one or more psychotropic medications is prescribed and an indicator that identifies each child of any age for whom three or more psychotropic medications are prescribed.

(c) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall distribute to a county placing agency the monthly report for children under its jurisdiction, if the placing agency is a signatory to the data sharing agreement described in subdivision (a).

(2) A county placing agency shall use the form developed pursuant to paragraph (3) to share information pertaining to a child with the appropriate juvenile court, the child’s attorney, the county department of behavioral health, and the court-appointed special advocate, if one has been appointed.

(A) In the case of the juvenile court, the information described in subdivision (a)
 shall be shared in conjunction with reports prepared for each regularly scheduled court hearing.

(B) In the case of the child’s attorney, the county department of behavioral health, and court-appointed special advocate, the information described in subdivision (a) shall be shared initially for each child served by these individuals upon the authorization of psychotropic medication, and subsequently when that information changes.

(3) In consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, the County Welfare Directors Association, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and stakeholders, the State Department of Social Services shall develop a form to be utilized in sharing the information required by paragraph (2).

(d) In consultation with
 the State Department of Health Care Services, the Judicial Council, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and stakeholders, the State Department of Social Services shall develop training that may be provided to county child welfare social workers, probation officers, courts hearing cases pursuant to Section 300, 601, or 602, children’s attorneys, children’s caregivers, court-appointed special advocates, and other relevant staff who work with children under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court that addresses the authorization, uses, risks, benefits, assistance with self-administration, oversight, and monitoring of psychotropic medications, trauma, and substance use disorder and mental health treatments, including how to access those treatments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 534, Sec. 10.   (SB 238)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.45.

(a) To ensure compliance with federal reporting requirements, including those of Public Law 113-183, the Preventing Sex Trafficking and Strengthening Families Act, the State Department of Social Services shall ensure that the statewide child welfare information system is capable of collecting all of the following information:

(1) The number of dependent children or wards in foster care who were victims of commercial sexual exploitation before entering foster care.

(2) The number of dependent children or wards in foster care who became victims of commercial sexual exploitation while in foster care.

(3) The number of dependent children or wards in foster care who go missing, run away, or are otherwise absent from care and were commercially sexually exploited during the time away from placement.

(4) The number of dependent children or wards in foster care who are at risk of becoming victims of commercial sexual exploitation.

(5) For children in foster care placed in group homes or short-term residential treatment centers, the data identified in Section 679b(a)(7)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(6) Data regarding children and nonminor dependents in foster care who are pregnant or parenting, as
 required by Section 679b(a)(7)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) County social workers and probation officers shall collect the data identified in subdivision (a) consistent with data entry instructions provided by the department.

(c) Upon the request of the department, a county child welfare agency, county probation department, or entity operating a program pursuant to an agreement with the department under Section 10553.1, shall provide additional information or data necessary for the department to comply with federal reporting requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 72.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.5.

(a) In order to protect children and effectively administer and evaluate California’s Child Welfare Services and Foster Care programs, the department shall implement a single statewide Child Welfare Services Case Management System no later than July 1, 1993.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in developing and implementing a statewide Child Welfare Services Case Management System to minimize the administrative and systems barriers that inhibit the effective provision of services to children and families by applying current technology to the systems that support the provision and management of child welfare services. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that the Child Welfare Services Case Management System achieve all of the following:

(1) Provide child welfare services workers with immediate access to child and family specific information in order to make appropriate and expeditious case decisions.

(2) Provide child welfare services workers with the case management information needed to effectively and efficiently manage their caseloads and take appropriate and timely case management actions.

(3) Provide state and county child welfare services management with the information needed to monitor and evaluate the accomplishment of child welfare services tasks and goals.

(4) Provide all child welfare services agencies with a common database and definition of information from which to evaluate the child welfare services programs in terms of the following:

(A) Effectiveness in meeting statutory and regulatory mandates, goals, and objectives of the programs.

(B) Effectiveness in meeting the needs of the families and children serviced by the program.

(C) Projecting and planning for the future needs of the families and children served by the program.

(5) Meeting federal statistical reporting requirements with a minimum of duplication of effort.
